src/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
!! !!!Adjective inflection for Northern Mansi
! --------------------

!! No work on adjectives yet.


LEXICON A_
+A+Attr:   # ;
+A: Comparisons ;

LEXICON Comparisons
+Pos:0        #   ;
+Comp:%>нув       #   ; ! fix this
+Comp:%>нуве       #   ; ! fix this
!+Superl:%>xxx      #   ;  ! fix this






! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
